Mississippi, session 2026, HB572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-26-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-26-11.  (1)  There shall be created local offices of the Department of Child Protection Services in those locations throughout the state as determined by the commissioner.  It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of each county in which a local office is located to provide adequate and habitable office space for the local offices. The local office of the Department of Child Protection Services shall administer all forms of child welfare services with the exception of those administered by the Department of Human Services.  The local offices shall comply with such regulations and submit such reports as may be established or required by the commissioner. Subject to the approval of the commissioner, the local offices may cooperate with other departments, agencies and institutions, state and local, when so requested, in performing services in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The Department of Child Protection Services may enter into a lease with each county board of supervisors in each county where a local office is located to allow the department to maximize the availability of federal funds.  Fair market value for the county-furnished building will be established and the department shall pay the federal share for the rent to the county.  All other expenses related to the operation of the local office shall be split between the department, providing the federal share, and the county, being responsible for the remainder or the state share.  This includes, but is not limited to, electricity, water, gas, Internet, and janitorial services and supplies.  All maintenance and repairs of the local office shall be the responsibility of the county due to the prohibition of federal funds for improvements of real property. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.